West Virginia, session 2025, HB2011.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: That the total appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to fund 5090, fiscal year 2025, organization 0511, be supplemented and amended by increasing an existing item of appropriation as follows: Title II – Appropriations. Sec. 3. Appropriations from other funds. department of HUMAN SERVICES. 261 - Department of Human Services –   Health Care Provider Tax –    Medicaid State Share Fund	(W.V. Code Chapter 11)Fund 5090 FY 2025 Org 0511	Appro-	Other	priation	Funds Medical Services		18900	$	123,000,000 The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................                                                                                          	Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home